Missouri, session 2026, HB2922.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the state of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Section 191.480, RSMo, is repealed and one new section enacted in lieu
thereof, to be known as section 191.480, to read as follows:
191.480. 1. For purposes of this section, the following terms shall mean:
(1) "Eligible patient", a person who meets all of the following:
(a) Has a terminal condition or illness, a life-threatening condition or illness, or a
severely debilitating condition or illness;
(b) Has considered all other treatment options currently approved by the United
States Food and Drug Administration and all relevant clinical trials conducted in this state;
(c) Has received a prescription or recommendation from the person's physician for an
investigational drug, biological product, or device;
(d) Has given written informed consent which shall be at least as comprehensive as
the consent used in clinical trials for the use of the investigational drug, biological product, or
device or, if the patient is a minor or lacks the mental capacity to provide informed consent, a
parent or legal guardian has given written informed consent on the patient's behalf; and
(e) Has documentation from the person's physician that the person has met the
requirements of this subdivision;
(2) "Investigational drug, biological product, or device", a drug, biological product, or
device, any of which are used to treat the patient's terminal condition or illness, life-
threatening condition or illness, or severely debilitating condition or illness, that has
EXPLANATION — Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in the above bill is not enacted and is
intended to be omitted from the law. Matter in bold-face type in the above bill is proposed language.

HB 2922 2
successfully completed phase one of a clinical trial but has not been approved for general use
by the United States Food and Drug Administration and remains under investigation in a
clinical trial[. The term shall not include Schedule I controlled substances];
(3) "Life-threatening condition or illness", a disease or condition:
(a) Where the likelihood of death is high unless the course of the disease or
condition is interrupted; and
(b) With potentially fatal outcomes, where the end point of clinical trial analysis
is survival;
(4) "Severely debilitating condition or illness", a disease or condition that causes
major irreversible morbidity;
(5) "Terminal condition or illness", a disease or condition that without life-
sustaining procedures will result in death in the near future or a state of permanent
unconsciousness from which recovery is unlikely.
2. A manufacturer of an investigational drug, biological product, or device may make
available the manufacturer's investigational drug, biological product, or device to eligible
patients under this section. This section does not require that a manufacturer make available
an investigational drug, biological product, or device to an eligible patient. A manufacturer
may:
(1) Provide an investigational drug, biological product, or device to an eligible patient
without receiving compensation; or
(2) Require an eligible patient to pay the costs of or associated with the manufacture
of the investigational drug, biological product, or device.
3. This section does not require a health care insurer to provide coverage for the cost
of any investigational drug, biological product, or device. A health care insurer may provide
coverage for an investigational drug, biological product, or device.
4. This section does not require the department of corrections to provide coverage for
the cost of any investigational drug, biological product, or device.
5. Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary, no state agency or
regulatory board shall revoke, fail to renew, or take any other action against a physician's
license issued under chapter 334 based solely on the physician's recommendation to an
eligible patient regarding prescription for or treatment with an investigational drug, biological
product, or device. Action against a health care provider's Medicare certification based solely
on the health care provider's recommendation that a patient have access to an investigational
drug, biological product, or device is prohibited.
6. If a provision of this section or its application to any person or circumstance is held
invalid, the invalidity does not affect other provisions or applications of this section that can

HB 2922 3
be given effect without the invalid provision or application, and to this end the provisions of
this section are severable.
7. If the clinical trial is closed due to lack of efficacy or toxicity, the drug shall not be
offered. If notice is given on a drug, product, or device taken by a patient outside of a clinical
trial, the pharmaceutical company or patient's physician shall notify the patient of the
information from the safety committee of the clinical trial.
8. Except in the case of gross negligence or willful misconduct, any person who
manufactures, imports, distributes, prescribes, dispenses, or administers an investigational
drug or device to an eligible patient with a terminal condition or illness, a life-threatening
condition or illness, or a severely debilitating condition or illness in accordance with this
section shall not be liable in any action under state law for any loss, damage, or injury arising
out of, relating to, or resulting from:
(1) The design, development, clinical testing and investigation, manufacturing,
labeling, distribution, sale, purchase, donation, dispensing, prescription, administration, or
use of the drug or device; or
(2) The safety or effectiveness of the drug or device.
✔